Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.261

Petitions—Improperly signing.

The following apply to persons signing filing fee petitions prescribed by RCW 29A.24.101:

(1) A person who signs a petition with any other than his or her name shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if the person knowingly: Signs more than one petition for any single candidacy of any single candidate; signs the petition when he or she is not a legal voter; or makes a false statement as to his or her residence.

[ 2013 c 11 s 81; 2004 c 271 s 184.]